District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-1525

Interdepartmental advisory committee.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-227, § 6, 36 DCR 607
Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 401, 45 DCR 1172

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2625.